Missouri, session 2026, HB2225.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapters 1 and 8, RSMo, are amended by adding thereto four new
sections, to be known as sections 1.510, 1.511, 1.1300, and 8.930, to read as follows:
1.510. 1. There is hereby established the "Missouri State Technology Task
Force".
2. The task force shall consist of:
(1) Five members of the house of representatives, with three members to be
appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives and two members to be
appointed by the minority leader of the house of representatives;
(2) Three members of the senate, with two members to be appointed by the
president pro tempore of the senate and one member to be appointed by the minority
leader of the senate;
(3) The lieutenant governor or the lieutenant governor's designee;
(4) The secretary of state or the secretary's designee;
(5) The chief information officer of the office of administration, one member of
the information technology advisory board of the office of administration, one
additional member representing the office of administration, and one member of the
department of higher education and workforce development or the department's
designee;
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2225 2
(6) Five members appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives, with
subject-matter expertise in the following areas:
(a) Missouri-based technology providers; or
(b) Cybersecurity; and
(7) Three members appointed by the president pro tempore of the senate, with
subject-matter expertise in the following areas:
(a) Web-based communication services;
(b) Electronic records and storage retention; or
(c) Large-scale software implementation.
3. The speaker of the house of representatives shall designate the chair of the
task force, and the president pro tempore of the senate shall designate the vice chair of
the task force.
4. Staff members of house research, house drafting, senate research, and the
joint committee on legislative research shall provide such legal, research, clerical,
technical, and bill drafting services as the task force may require in the performance of
its duties.
5. Members of the task force shall serve without compensation, but the members
and any staff assigned to the task force shall receive reimbursement for actual and
necessary expenses incurred in attending meetings of the task force or any
subcommittee thereof. All task force members shall be subject to the same conflict-
of-interest provisions in chapter 105 that are enforced by the Missouri ethics
commission in the same manner that elected or appointed officials and employees are
subject to such provisions.
6. The task force shall hold its first meeting within two months from the effective
date of this section.
7. The mission of the task force shall be to:
(1) Evaluate the condition of the state's current technology platforms;
(2) Evaluate the uses of cloud computing and artificial intelligence to improve
the state's technological foundation and customer service;
(3) Evaluate the state's certificate programs and workforce development efforts,
including any efforts to use knowledge models to help guide students into certain
employment areas from young ages so that they are able to advance in rewarding
careers;
(4) Research and review adaptive technology initiatives for state use;
(5) Evaluate current cost-spending and cost-saving state technological protocols;
(6) Make recommendations regarding the condition of the state's technological
systems;

HB 2225 3
(7) Make recommendations regarding the condition of the state's citizen-
accessible technology platforms; and
(8) Make recommendations regarding the use of technology and artificial
intelligence to improve state management of records and to enable Missouri citizens and
agencies to have more efficient electronic communications and access.
8. The task force shall report a summary of its activities and any
recommendations for legislation to the general assembly before August 28, 2027.
9. (1) The task force shall suspend its operations on January 1, 2028. At such
time, all members of the task force shall be relieved of their position on the task force.
(2) The task force shall resume its operations on January 1, 2029, with a new set
of members to be selected in the manner of subsection 2 of this section. The new chair
and the new vice chair of the task force shall be designated as provided under subsection
3 of this section.
(3) Upon resumption of its operations, the task force shall continue to receive
services according to subsection 4 of this section and shall continue to be subject to all
provisions of subsection 5 of this section.
(4) Upon resumption of its operations, the task force shall review all summaries
and recommendations previously made under subsection 8 of this section and shall
continue to carry out the mission described under subsection 7 of this section.
(5) Upon resumption of its operations, the task force shall report an updated
summary of its activities and any recommendations for legislation to the general
assembly before August 28, 2029.
(6) After providing a report to the general assembly as required under
subdivision (5) of this subsection, the task force shall continue to meet every two years
periodically until this section expires. The task force shall provide additional updated
summaries of its activities and additional recommendations for legislation to the general
assembly, at such times as the task force deems necessary, until the task force is
terminated.
10. Under section 23.253 of the Missouri sunset act:
(1) The provisions of the new program authorized under this section shall
automatically sunset twelve years after the effective date of this section unless
reauthorized by an act of the general assembly;
(2) If such program is reauthorized, the program authorized under this section
shall automatically sunset twelve years after the effective date of the reauthorization of
this section; and

HB 2225 4
(3) This section shall terminate on September first of the calendar year
immediately following the calendar year in which the program authorized under this
section is sunset.
1.511. 1. There is hereby established the "Twenty-First Century Innovation Hub
Task Force".
2. The task force shall consist of:
(1) Five members of the house of representatives, with three members to be
appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives and two members to be
appointed by the minority leader of the house of representatives;
(2) Three members of the senate, with two members to be appointed by the
president pro tempore of the senate and one member to be appointed by the minority
leader of the senate;
(3) The commissioner of education or the commissioner's designee;
(4) One member representing the department of higher education and
workforce development, appointed by the commissioner of higher education;
(5) One member representing public universities in the state, appointed by the
speaker of the house of representatives;
(6) Five members appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives, each
of whom has subject-matter expertise in one of the following:
(a) Agricultural technology;
(b) Business, representing a business organization in this state;
(c) Farming, representing a farming organization in this state;
(d) Food technology; and
(e) Health sciences; and
(7) Eleven members representing each of the following organizations, with eight
members appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives and three members
appointed by the president pro tempore of the senate:
(a) BioSTL;
(b) The Center for Rural Health Innovation;
(c) The Danforth Plant Science Center;
(d) The Early Adopter Grower Innovation Community;
(e) The Independent Colleges and Universities of Missouri;
(f) The Missouri Cattlemen's Association;
(g) The Missouri Community College Association;
(h) The Missouri Corn Growers Association;
(i) The Missouri Partnership;
(j) The Missouri Soybean Association; and

HB 2225 5
(k) The State Technical College of Missouri.
3. The speaker of the house of representatives shall designate the chair of the
task force, and the president pro tempore of the senate shall designate the vice chair of
the task force.
4. Staff members of house research, house drafting, senate research, and the
joint committee on legislative research shall provide such legal, research, clerical,
technical, and bill drafting services as the task force may require in the performance of
its duties.
5. Members of the task force shall serve without compensation, but the members
and any staff assigned to the task force shall receive reimbursement for actual and
necessary expenses incurred in attending meetings of the task force or any
subcommittee thereof. All task force members shall be subject to the same conflict-
of-interest provisions in chapter 105 that are enforced by the Missouri ethics
commission in the same manner that elected or appointed officials and employees are
subject to such provisions.
6. The task force shall hold its first meeting within two months from the effective
date of this section.
7. The mission of the task force shall be to maximize and expand existing
industries that spur technological innovation throughout the state, with particular focus
on the areas of agricultural technology, health sciences, and food technology, and to
create more jobs in the technology sector.
8. The task force shall report a summary of its activities and any
recommendations for legislation to the general assembly before August 28, 2027.
9. (1) The task force shall suspend its operations on January 1, 2028. At such
time, all members of the task force shall be relieved of their positions on the task force.
(2) The task force shall resume its operations on January 1, 2029, with a new set
of members to be selected in the manner of subsection 2 of this section. The new chair
and the new vice chair of the task force shall be designated according to the provisions
of subsection 3 of this section.
(3) Upon resumption of its operations, the task force shall continue to receive
services according to subsection 4 of this section and shall continue to be subject to all
provisions of subsection 5 of this section.
(4) Upon resumption of its operations, the task force shall review all summaries
and recommendations previously made under subsection 8 of this section and shall
continue to carry out the mission described under subsection 7 of this section.

HB 2225 6
(5) Upon resumption of its operations, the task force shall report an updated
summary of its activities and any recommendations for legislation to the general
assembly before August 28, 2029.
(6) After providing a report to the general assembly as required under
subdivision (5) of this subsection, the task force shall continue to meet every two years
periodically until this section expires. The task force shall provide additional updated
summaries of its activities and additional recommendations for legislation to the general
assembly, at such times as the task force deems necessary, until the task force is
terminated.
10. Under section 23.253 of the Missouri sunset act:
(1) The provisions of the new program authorized under this section shall
automatically sunset twelve years after the effective date of this section unless
reauthorized by an act of the general assembly;
(2) If such program is reauthorized, the program authorized under this section
shall automatically sunset twelve years after the effective date of the reauthorization of
this section; and
(3) This section shall terminate on September first of the calendar year
immediately following the calendar year in which the program authorized under this
section is sunset.
1.1300. 1. There is hereby created the "Decentralizing State Government Task
Force".
2. The members of the task force shall be as follows:
(1) Three members of the house of representatives, with two members appointed
by the speaker of the house of representatives and one member appointed by the
minority leader of the house of representatives;
(2) Three members of the senate, with two members appointed by the president
pro tempore of the senate and one member appointed by the minority leader of the
senate;
(3) The state auditor or his or her designee; and
(4) The commissioner of administration or his or her designee.
3. The speaker of the house of representatives shall designate the chair of the
task force, and the president pro tempore of the senate shall designate the vice chair of
the task force.
4. Staff offices including, but not limited to, house research, house drafting,
senate research, and the joint committee on legislative research shall provide such legal,
research, clerical, technical, and bill drafting services as the task force may require in
the performance of its duties.

HB 2225 7
5. Members of the task force shall serve without compensation, but the members
and any staff assigned to the task force shall receive reimbursement for actual and
necessary expenses incurred in attending meetings of the task force or any
subcommittee thereof. All task force members shall be subject to the same conflict-
of-interest provisions in chapter 105 that are enforced by the Missouri ethics
commission in the same manner that elected or appointed officials and employees are
subject to such provisions.
6. The task force shall hold its first meeting within two months from the effective
date of this section.
7. The duties of the task force shall be to:
(1) Evaluate the degree of centralization of the various functions of government;
(2) Evaluate the capacity for the private sector and political subdivisions to
assume responsibilities currently under the purview of state government; and
(3) Make recommendations regarding decentralizing state government to the
general assembly.
8. The task force shall report a summary of its activities and recommendations
to the general assembly before September 30, 2027.
9. (1) The task force shall suspend its operations on September 30, 2027. At
such time, all members of the task force shall be relieved of their position on the task
force.
(2) The task force shall resume its operations on September 30, 2028, with a new
set of members to be selected according to the provisions of subsection 2 of this section.
The new chair and the new vice chair of the task force shall be designated according to
the provisions of subsection 3 of this section.
(3) Upon resumption of its operations, the task force shall continue to receive
services according to the provisions of subsection 4 of this section and shall continue to
be subject to all provisions of subsection 5 of this section.
(4) Upon resumption of its operations, the task force shall review all summaries
and recommendations previously made under subsection 8 of this section and shall
continue to carry out the duties described in subsection 7 of this section.
(5) Upon resumption of its operations, the task force shall report an updated
summary of its activities and any recommendations for legislation to the general
assembly before September 30, 2029.
(6) After providing a report to the general assembly as required under
subdivision (5) of this subsection, the task force shall continue to meet every two years
until this section expires. The task force shall provide additional updated summaries of

HB 2225 8
its activities and additional recommendations for legislation to the general assembly, at
such times as the task force deems necessary, until the task force is terminated.
10. Under section 23.253 of the Missouri sunset act:
(1) The provisions of the new program authorized under this section shall
automatically sunset twelve years after the effective date of this section unless
reauthorized by an act of the general assembly;
(2) If such program is reauthorized, the program authorized under this section
shall automatically sunset twelve years after the effective date of the reauthorization of
this section; and
(3) This section shall terminate on September thirtieth of the calendar year
immediately following the calendar year in which the program authorized under this
section is sunset.
8.930. 1. There is hereby created the "State Building Usage Task Force".
2. The members of the task force shall be as follows:
(1) Three members of the house of representatives, with two members appointed
by the speaker of the house of representatives and one member appointed by the
minority leader of the house of representatives;
(2) Three members of the senate, with two members appointed by the president
pro tempore of the senate and one member appointed by the minority leader of the
senate;
(3) The state auditor or his or her designee; and
(4) The commissioner of administration or his or her designee.
3. The speaker of the house of representatives shall designate the chair of the
task force, and the president pro tempore of the senate shall designate the vice chair of
the task force.
4. Staff offices including, but not limited to, house research, house drafting,
senate research, and the joint committee on legislative research shall provide such legal,
research, clerical, technical, and bill drafting services as the task force may require in
the performance of its duties.
5. Members of the task force shall serve without compensation, but the members
and any staff assigned to the task force shall receive reimbursement for actual and
necessary expenses incurred in attending meetings of the task force or any
subcommittee thereof. All task force members shall be subject to the same conflict-
of-interest provisions in chapter 105 that are enforced by the Missouri ethics
commission in the same manner that elected or appointed officials and employees are
subject to such provisions.

HB 2225 9
6. The task force shall hold its first meeting within two months from the effective
date of this section.
7. The duties of the task force shall be to:
(1) Provide and maintain an accurate account of all Missouri state government-
owned and -leased real property, including property purchased as a right-of-way by the
department of transportation;
(2) Evaluate the conditions of all Missouri state government-owned and -leased
real property, including identifying the utility costs associated with the real property
and how often the real property is being utilized;
(3) Evaluate the current funding each Missouri state government-owned and
-leased real property is receiving for the purpose of maintaining the real property;
(4) Evaluate whether the current funding received for maintaining the real
property is sufficient to maintain the integrity of the real property and necessary
compared to the amount of usage the real property receives;
(5) Make recommendations regarding the conditions of state government-owned
and -leased real property, including if the real property is in need of rehabilitation or
liquidation and if the utility costs associated with the real property could be reduced;
(6) For all real properties identified as in need of rehabilitation or liquidation,
create a detailed plan for the rehabilitation or liquidation that may be implemented
within two years; and
(7) Make recommendations regarding funding of state government-owned and
-leased real property as it pertains to funding for maintaining the real property.

Real properties owned and leased by public schools, as that term is defined in section
160.011, shall not be included in the task force's evaluations.
8. The office of administration shall, within sixty days of the effective date of this
section, provide a complete list of all government-owned and -leased real property to the
task force. The office of administration shall provide an updated list to the task force
following any change to the status of government-owned or -leased real property. The
office of administration shall provide a new list to the task force each time the task force
resumes operations, as provided in subsection 10 of this section.
9. The task force shall report a summary of its activities and recommendations
to the general assembly before September 30, 2027.
10. (1) The task force shall suspend its operations on September 30, 2027. At
such time, all members of the task force shall be relieved of their position on the task
force.

HB 2225 10
(2) The task force shall resume its operations on September 30, 2028, with a new
set of members to be selected according to the provisions of subsection 2 of this section.
The new chair and the new vice chair of the task force shall be designated according to
the provisions of subsection 3 of this section.
(3) Upon resumption of its operations, the task force shall continue to receive
services according to the provisions of subsection 4 of this section and shall continue to
be subject to all provisions of subsection 5 of this section.
(4) Upon resumption of its operations, the task force shall review all summaries
and recommendations previously made under subsection 8 of this section and shall
continue to carry out the duties described in subsection 7 of this section.
(5) Upon resumption of its operations, the task force shall report an updated
summary of its activities and any recommendations for legislation to the general
assembly before September 30, 2029.
(6) After providing a report to the general assembly as required under
subdivision (5) of this subsection, the task force shall continue to meet every two years
until this section expires. The task force shall provide additional updated summaries of
its activities and additional recommendations for legislation to the general assembly, at
such times as the task force deems necessary, until the task force is terminated.
11. Under section 23.253 of the Missouri sunset act:
(1) The provisions of the new program authorized under this section shall
automatically sunset twelve years after the effective date of this section unless
reauthorized by an act of the general assembly;
(2) If such program is reauthorized, the program authorized under this section
shall automatically sunset twelve years after the effective date of the reauthorization of
this section; and
(3) This section shall terminate on September thirtieth of the calendar year
immediately following the calendar year in which the program authorized under this
section is sunset.
✔